Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-401
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-401 to 38-414 shall be known and may be cited as the Athletic Training Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 173;

Laws 2022, LB436, § 1.